District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.09

Delegation and redelegation of authority.

The Department is the successor in interest to all committed and detained youth and Person in Need of Supervision related authority delegated to the Department of Human Services, and the Director of the Department is authorized to act, either personally or through a designated representative, as a member of any committees, commissions, boards, or other bodies that include as a member the Director of the Department of Human Services.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 109, 52 DCR 2025
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 109 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-657, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 481).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 109 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-58, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3182).